Idaho, session 2025, S1202.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Public Defender the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes
from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $10,020,900 $21,061,200 $31,082,100
Public Defense
Fund 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
TOTAL $10,020,900 $23,561,200 $33,582,100
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Office of the State Public Defender is hereby
reduced by $1,200,000 for personnel costs from the Public Defense Fund for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided in law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of the State Public Defender is hereby increased by seventeen
and ninety-six hundredths (17.96) for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026.
SECTION 4. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
137, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the Office of the State Public Defender the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated expense classes from the
listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $1,960,900 $2,229,200 $4,190,100
Public Defense
Fund 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
TOTAL $1,960,900 $4,729,200 $6,690,100
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 4 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 3 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.